Nevada, session 83, SB368.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20
U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto
is repealed by the Federal Government, in whole or in part:
(a) Any such repealed provision is hereby adopted by this State
as it existed on the effective date of this act and such provision
shall continue in force;
(b) Any person who had the right to bring a civil action in a
district court of the United States under any such repealed
provision may bring such an equivalent action in a court of
competent jurisdiction of this State pursuant to this section;
(c) Any existing references to any such repealed provision in
the Nevada Revised Statutes become references to the provision as
it existed on the effective date of this act; and
(d) Any federal funding provided to this State for purposes
relating to special education, the use of which is not otherwise
restricted, shall be used, except as otherwise provided by the
Legislature, for the purpose of identifying and evaluating pupils
with disabilities and for providing services to pupils with
disabilities pursuant to NRS 388.417 to 388.515, inclusive.
2. The Department shall adopt regulations as necessary to
carry out the provisions of this act.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the
application of any other provision of chapters 388 and 392 of
NRS.
Sec. 2. NRS 388.417 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.417 As used in NRS 388.417 to 388.515, inclusive [:] ,
and section 1 of this act:
1. “Communication mode” means any system or method of
communication used by a person with a disability, including,
without limitation, a person who is deaf or whose hearing is
impaired, to facilitate communication which may include, without
limitation:
(a) American Sign Language;
(b) English-based manual or sign systems;
(c) Oral and aural communication;
(d) Spoken and written English, including speech reading or lip
reading; and
-
*SB368_R1*

– 3 –
(e) Communication with assistive technology devices.
2. “Dyslexia” means a neurological learning disability
characterized by difficulties with accurate and fluent word
recognition and poor spelling and decoding abilities that typically
result from a deficit in the phonological component of language.
3. “Dyslexia intervention” means systematic, multisensory
intervention offered in an appropriate setting that is derived from
evidence-based research.
4. “Individualized education program” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(A).
5. “Individualized education program team” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(B).
6. “Provider of special education” means a school within a
school district or charter school that provides education or services
to pupils with disabilities or any other entity that is responsible for
providing education or services to a pupil with a disability for a
school district or charter school.
7. “Pupil who receives early intervening services” means a
person enrolled in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, who is
not a pupil with a disability but who needs additional academic and
behavioral support to succeed in a regular school program.
8. “Pupil with a disability” means a “child with a disability,” as
that term is defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(3)(A), who is under 22
years of age.
9. “Response to scientific, research-based intervention” means
a collaborative process which assesses a pupil’s response to
scientific, research-based intervention that is matched to the needs
of a pupil and that systematically monitors the level of performance
and rate of learning of the pupil over time for the purpose of making
data-based decisions concerning the need of the pupil for
increasingly intensified services.
10. “Specific learning disability” means a disorder in one or
more of the basic psychological processes involved in understanding
or using spoken or written language which is not primarily the result
of a visual, hearing or motor impairment, intellectual disability,
serious emotional disturbance, or an environmental, cultural or
economic disadvantage. Such a disorder may manifest itself in an
imperfect ability to listen, think, speak, read, write, spell or perform
mathematical calculations. The term includes, without limitation,
perceptual disabilities, brain injury, minimal brain dysfunction,
dyslexia and developmental aphasia.
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
-
*SB368_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB368_R1*